Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-268
Long-term suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment; procedures; enumerated.

If a principal makes a decision to discipline a student by long-term suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment, the following procedures shall be followed:

(1) The decision as to recommend discipline shall be made within two school days after learning of the alleged student misconduct. On the date of the decision, a written charge and a summary of the evidence supporting such charge shall be filed with the superintendent. The school shall, within two school days after the decision, send written notice by registered or certified mail to the student and his or her parent or guardian informing them of the rights established under the Student Discipline Act;

(2) Such written notice shall include the following:

(a) The rule or standard of conduct allegedly violated and the acts of the student alleged to constitute a cause for long-term suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment, including a summary of the evidence to be presented against the student;

(b) The penalty, if any, which the principal has recommended in the charge and any other penalty to which the student may be subject;

(c) Resources the school is able to provide or recommend to assist the student;

(d) How the school plans to handle such behavior in the future, including an actionable plan aimed at maximizing strategies to keep the student in school;

(e) A statement that, before long-term suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment can be invoked, the student has a right to a hearing, upon request, and that if the student is suspended pending the outcome of the hearing, the student may complete classwork and homework, including, but not limited to, examinations, missed during the period of suspension pursuant to district guidelines which shall not require the student to attend the school district's alternative programs for expelled students in order to complete classwork or homework;

(f) A description of the hearing procedures provided by the act, along with procedures for appealing any decision rendered at the hearing;

(g) A statement that the principal, legal counsel for the school, the student, the student's parent, or the student's representative or guardian has the right (i) to examine the student's academic and disciplinary records and any affidavits to be used at the hearing concerning the alleged misconduct and (ii) to know the identity of the witnesses to appear at the hearing and the substance of their testimony; and

(h) A form on which the student, the student's parent, or the student's guardian may request a hearing, to be signed by such parties and delivered to the principal or superintendent in person or by registered or certified mail to the address provided on such form, as prescribed in sections 79-271 and 79-272;

(3) When a notice of intent to discipline a student by long-term suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment is filed with the superintendent, the student may be suspended by the principal until the date the long-term suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment takes effect, if the principal determines that the student must be suspended immediately to prevent or substantially reduce the risk of (a) interference with an educational function or school purpose or (b) a personal injury to the student himself or herself, other students, school employees, or school volunteers; and

(4) For purposes of this section, mandatory reassignment, regardless of its implementation date, shall be subject to the procedures of this section.

The Student Discipline Act does not preclude the student or the student's parent, guardian, or representative from discussing and settling the matter with appropriate school personnel prior to the time the long-term suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment takes effect.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 12;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 18;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,181;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 72;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 67;

Laws 2026, LB653, § 4.
July 18, 2026